Utah statutes.
78B-6-906.   Right of redemption -- Sales by parcels -- Of land and water stock.

(1)  Sales of real estate under judgments of foreclosure of mortgages and liens are subject to redemption as in case of sales under executions generally.

(2)  In all cases where the judgment directs the sale of land, together with shares of corporate stock evidencing title to a water right used, intended to be used, or suitable for use, on the land, the court shall equitably apportion the water stock to the land.  If the court divides the land into individual parcels for sale, the water stock may also be divided and applied to each parcel.  The land and water stock in each parcel shall be sold together, and for the purpose of the sale shall be regarded as real estate and subject to redemption as previously specified.

(3)  In all sales of real estate under foreclosure the court may determine the parcels and the order in which the parcels of property shall be sold.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 3, 2008 General Session

